Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB688.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 314.041 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse shall file with the board a
written application for a license and submit evidence, verified by oath, that the
applicant:
(a) Has completed the basic curriculum for preparing registered nurses in an
approved school of nursing and has completed requirements for graduation
therefrom;
(b) Is able to understandably speak and write the English language and to read the
English language with comprehension; and
(c) Has passed the jurisprudence examination approved by the board as provided
by subsection (4) of this section.
(2) [Except as authorized by subsection (7) of this section, ]An applicant shall be
required to pass a licensure examination in any subjects as the board may
determine. Application for licensure by examination shall be received by the board
at the time determined by the board by administrative regulation.
(3) Upon request, an applicant who meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section shall be issued a provisional license that shall expire no later than six (6)
months from the date of issuance.
(4) The jurisprudence examination shall be prescribed by the board and be conducted
on the licensing requirements under this chapter and board regulations and
requirements applicable to the nursing profession in this Commonwealth. The board
shall promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
establishing the provisions to meet this requirement.
(5) An individual who holds a provisional license shall have the right to use the title
"registered nurse applicant" and the abbreviation "R.N.A." An R.N.A. shall only
Page 1 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
work under the direct supervision of a registered nurse and shall not engage in
independent nursing practice.
(6) Upon the applicant's successful completion of all requirements for registered nurse
licensure, the board may issue to the applicant a license to practice nursing as a
registered nurse, if in the determination of the board the applicant is qualified to
practice as a registered nurse in this state.
(7) (a) The board may[shall] issue a temporary work permit to practice nursing as a
registered nurse to any applicant who has been licensed as a registered nurse
under the laws of another state or territory, if the applicant is a currently
licensed registered nurse in good standing in each state or territory in which
the applicant has worked.
(b) The board may[shall] issue a license to practice nursing as a registered nurse
to any applicant who has passed the jurisprudence examination prescribed by
the board or its equivalent and who has been licensed as a registered nurse
under the laws of another state or territory if the applicant is a currently
licensed registered nurse in good standing in each state or territory in which
the applicant has worked.
(c) The board may[shall] accept the licensure examination of another state as
sufficient for licensure under this subsection.
(d) The board may require a registered nurse practicing as authorized by this
subsection to submit to a background check as required by KRS 314.103.
[(e) This subsection shall not apply to an applicant who holds a multistate license
in good standing in a state or territory that is a member of the Nurse Licensure
Compact established in KRS 314.475.]
(8) The board may issue a license to practice nursing as a registered nurse to any
applicant who has passed the licensure examination and the jurisprudence
examination prescribed by the board or their equivalent and been licensed as a
Page 2 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
registered nurse under the laws of a foreign country, if in the opinion of the board
the applicant is qualified to practice as a registered nurse in this state.
(9) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter
13A to establish temporary work permit requirements for a registered nurse who is
a graduate of a foreign nursing school and is pursuing licensure by endorsement
under subsection (10) of this section.
(10) The board may[shall] immediately issue a license by endorsement to practice
nursing as a registered nurse to an applicant who:
(a) Is a graduate of a foreign nursing school;
(b) Provides:
1. Documentation that the applicant has taken and received a passing score
on the National Council Licensure Examination (NCLEX); and
2. One (1) of the following:
a. A satisfactory Credentials Evaluation Service Professional Report
issued by the Commission on Graduates of Foreign Nursing
Schools International, Inc. (CGFNS) or other international nurse
credentialing organization recognized by the board; or
b. A satisfactory VisaScreen ICHP Certificate Verification Letter
issued by CGFNS or other international nurse credentialing
organization recognized by the board; and
(c) Meets the other requirements of this section.
(11) The applicant for licensure to practice as a registered nurse shall pay a licensure
application fee, and licensure examination fees if applicable, as set forth in a
regulation by the board promulgated pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter
13A.
(12) Any person who holds a license to practice as a registered nurse in this state shall
have the right to use the title "registered nurse" and the abbreviation "R.N." No
Page 3 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
other person shall assume the title or use the abbreviation or any other words,
letters, signs, or figures to indicate that the person using the same is a registered
nurse. No person shall practice as a registered nurse unless licensed under this
section.
(13) (a) On November 1, 2006, and thereafter, a registered nurse who is retired, upon
payment of a one-time fee, may apply for a special license in recognition of
the nurse's retired status. A retired nurse may not practice nursing but may use
the title "registered nurse" and the abbreviation "R.N."
(b) A retired registered nurse who wishes to return to the practice of nursing shall
apply for reinstatement.
(c) The board shall promulgate an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS
Chapter 13A to specify the fee required in paragraph (a) of this subsection and
reinstatement under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(14) Any person heretofore licensed as a registered nurse under the licensing laws of this
state who has allowed the license to lapse by failure to renew may apply for
reinstatement of the license under the provisions of this chapter. A person whose
license has lapsed for one (1) year or more shall pass the jurisprudence examination
approved by the board as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(15) A license to practice registered nursing may be limited by the board in accordance
with regulations promulgated by the board and as defined in this chapter.
(16) A person who has completed a prelicensure registered nurse program and holds a
current, active licensed practical nurse license from another jurisdiction may apply
for licensure by endorsement as a licensed practical nurse in this state.
Section 2. KRS 314.051 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An applicant for a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse shall file with the
board a written application for a license verified by oath, that the applicant:
(a) Has completed the required educational program in practical nursing at an
Page 4 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
approved school of nursing and has completed requirements for graduation
therefrom;
(b) Is able to understandably speak and write the English language and to read the
English language with comprehension; and
(c) Has passed the jurisprudence examination approved by the board as provided
by subsection (4) of this section.
(2) The applicant for licensure to practice as a licensed practical nurse shall pay a
licensure application fee, and licensure examination fees if applicable, as set forth
in a regulation by the board.
(3) [Except as authorized by subsection (8) of this section, ]An applicant shall be
required to pass a licensure examination in any subjects the board may determine.
Application for licensure by examination shall be received by the board at the time
determined by the board by administrative regulation.
(4) The jurisprudence examination shall be prescribed by the board and be conducted
on the licensing requirements under this chapter and board regulations and
requirements applicable to the nursing profession in this Commonwealth. The board
shall promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
establishing the provisions to meet this requirement.
(5) Upon request, an applicant who meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section shall be issued a provisional license that shall expire no later than six (6)
months from the date of issuance.
(6) An individual who holds a provisional license shall have the right to use the title
"licensed practical nurse applicant" and the abbreviation "L.P.N.A." An L.P.N.A.
shall only work under the direct supervision of a nurse and shall not engage in
independent nursing practice.
(7) Upon the applicant's successful completion of all requirements for licensed
practical nurse licensure, the board may issue to the applicant a license to practice
Page 5 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
as a licensed practical nurse if, in the determination of the board, the applicant is
qualified to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state.
(8) (a) The board may[shall] issue a temporary work permit to practice nursing as a
licensed practical nurse to any applicant who has been licensed as a licensed
practical nurse under the laws of another state or territory, if the applicant is
currently a licensed practical nurse in good standing in each state or territory
in which the applicant has worked.
(b) The board may[shall] issue a license to practice nursing as a licensed practical
nurse to any applicant who has passed the jurisprudence examination
prescribed by the board or its equivalent and who has been licensed as a
licensed practical nurse under the laws of another state or territory if the
applicant is currently a licensed practical nurse in good standing in each state
or territory in which the applicant has worked.
(c) The board may[shall] accept the licensure examination of another state as
sufficient for licensure under this subsection.
(d) The board may require a licensed practical nurse practicing as authorized by
this subsection to submit to a background check as required by KRS 314.103.
[(e) This subsection shall not apply to an applicant who holds a multistate license
in good standing in a state or territory that is a member of the Nurse Licensure
Compact established in KRS 314.475.]
(9) The board may issue a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse to any
applicant who has passed the licensure examination and the jurisprudence
examination prescribed by the board or their equivalent, and has been licensed or
registered as a licensed practical nurse or a person licensed to perform similar
services under a different title, under the laws of a foreign country if, in the opinion
of the board, the applicant meets the requirements for a licensed practical nurse in
this state.
Page 6 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
(10) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter
13A to establish temporary work permit requirements for a licensed practical nurse
who is a graduate of a foreign nursing school and is pursuing licensure by
endorsement under subsection (11) of this section.
(11) The board may[shall] immediately issue a license by endorsement to practice
nursing as a licensed practical nurse to an applicant who:
(a) Is a graduate of a foreign nursing school;
(b) Provides:
1. Documentation that the applicant has taken and received a passing score
on the National Council Licensure Examination (NCLEX); and
2. One (1) of the following:
a. A satisfactory Credentials Evaluation Service Professional Report
issued by the Commission on Graduates of Foreign Nursing
Schools International, Inc. (CGFNS) or other international nurse
credentialing organization recognized by the board; or
b. A satisfactory VisaScreen ICHP Certificate Verification Letter
issued by CGFNS or other international nurse credentialing
organization recognized by the board; and
(c) Meets the other requirements of this section.
(12) Any person who holds a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state
shall have the right to use the title "licensed practical nurse" and the abbreviation
"L.P.N." No other person shall assume the title or use the abbreviation or any other
words, letters, signs, or figures to indicate that the person using the same is a
licensed practical nurse. No person shall practice as a licensed practical nurse
unless licensed under this chapter.
(13) (a) Beginning November 1, 2005, for a licensed practical nurse who is retired,
upon payment of a one-time fee, the board may issue a special license to a
Page 7 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
licensed practical nurse in recognition of the nurse's retired status. A retired
nurse may not practice nursing but may use the title "licensed practical nurse"
and the abbreviation "L.P.N."
(b) A retired licensed practical nurse who wishes to return to the practice of
nursing shall apply for reinstatement.
(c) The board shall promulgate an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS
Chapter 13A to specify the fee required in paragraph (a) of this subsection and
reinstatement under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(14) Any person heretofore licensed as a practical nurse under the licensing laws of this
state who has allowed the license to lapse by failure to renew may apply for
reinstatement of the license under the provisions of this chapter. A person whose
license has lapsed for one (1) year or more shall pass the jurisprudence examination
approved by the board as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(15) A license to practice practical nursing may be limited by the board in accordance
with regulations promulgated by the board and as defined in this chapter.
Section 3. KRS 314.042 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An applicant for licensure to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse shall
file with the board a written application for licensure and submit evidence, verified
by oath, that the applicant:
(a) Has completed an education program that prepares the registered nurse for
one (1) of four (4) APRN roles that has been accredited by a national nursing
accrediting body recognized by the United States Department of Education;
(b) Is certified by a nationally established organization or agency recognized by
the board to certify registered nurses for advanced practice registered nursing;
(c) Is able to understandably speak and write the English language and to read the
English language with comprehension; and
(d) Has passed the jurisprudence examination approved by the board as provided
Page 8 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
in subsection (5) of this section.
(2) Upon request, an applicant who meets the requirements of subsection (1)(a), (c),
and (d) of this section, but has not yet taken the national certification exam, may be
issued a provisional license that shall expire no later than six (6) months from the
date of issuance.
(3) An individual who holds a provisional license shall have the right to use the title
"advanced practice registered nurse applicant" and the abbreviation "APRNA." An
APRNA may function as an APRN, except for prescribing medications and shall
only practice under a mentorship with an advanced practice registered nurse or a
physician.
(4) (a) An APRNA shall take and pass the national certification exam recognized by
the board to the certify registered nurses for advanced practice registered
nursing within the six (6) month term of the provisional license to become a
fully licensed APRN.
(b) If the APRNA fails to take and pass the national certification exam on the first
attempt, the APRNA shall be given one (1) more opportunity to take and pass
the exam.
(c) If the APRNA does not pass the national certification exam on the second
attempt, the provisional license shall immediately be terminated.
(5) The jurisprudence examination shall be prescribed by the board and be conducted
on the licensing requirements under this chapter and administrative regulations
applicable to advance practice registered nursing promulgated in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A.
(6) The board may issue a license to practice advanced practice registered nursing to an
applicant who holds a current active registered nurse license issued by the board or
holds the privilege to practice as a registered nurse in this state and meets the
qualifications of subsection (1) of this section. An advanced practice registered
Page 9 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
nurse shall be:
(a) Designated by the board as a certified registered nurse anesthetist, certified
nurse midwife, certified nurse practitioner, or clinical nurse specialist; and
(b) Certified in at least one (1) population focus.
(7) The applicant for licensure or renewal thereof to practice as an advanced practice
registered nurse shall pay a fee to the board as set forth in regulation by the board.
(8) An advanced practice registered nurse shall maintain a current active registered
nurse license issued by the board or hold the privilege to practice as a registered
nurse in this state and maintain current certification by the appropriate national
organization or agency recognized by the board.
(9) Any person who holds a license to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse
in this state shall have the right to use the title "advanced practice registered nurse"
and the abbreviation "APRN." No other person shall assume the title or use the
abbreviation or any other words, letters, signs, or figures to indicate that the person
using the same is an advanced practice registered nurse. No person shall practice as
an advanced practice registered nurse unless licensed under this section.
(10) Any person heretofore licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse under the
provisions of this chapter who has allowed the license to lapse may be reinstated on
payment of the current fee and by meeting the provisions of this chapter and
regulations promulgated by the board pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter
13A.
(11) The board may authorize a person to practice as an advanced practice registered
nurse temporarily and pursuant to applicable regulations promulgated by the board
pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A if the person is awaiting licensure
by endorsement.
(12) (a) Except as authorized by subsection (13) of this section, before an advanced
practice registered nurse engages in the prescribing or dispensing of
Page 10 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
nonscheduled legend drugs as authorized by KRS 314.011(8), the advanced
practice registered nurse shall enter into a written "Collaborative Agreement
for the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse's Prescriptive Authority for
Nonscheduled Legend Drugs" (CAPA-NS) with a physician who has an
active and unrestricted license[licensed] in Kentucky that defines the scope
of the prescriptive authority for nonscheduled legend drugs.
(b) The advanced practice registered nurse shall notify the Kentucky Board of
Nursing of the existence of the CAPA-NS and the name of the collaborating
physician and shall, upon request, furnish to the board or its staff a copy of the
completed CAPA-NS. The Kentucky Board of Nursing shall notify the
Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure that a CAPA-NS exists and furnish the
collaborating physician's name.
(c) The CAPA-NS shall be in writing and signed by both the advanced practice
registered nurse and the collaborating physician. A copy of the completed
collaborative agreement shall be available at each site where the advanced
practice registered nurse is providing patient care.
(d) The CAPA-NS shall describe the arrangement for collaboration and
communication between the advanced practice registered nurse and the
collaborating physician regarding the prescribing of nonscheduled legend
drugs by the advanced practice registered nurse.
(e) The advanced practice registered nurse who is prescribing nonscheduled
legend drugs and the collaborating physician shall be qualified in the same or
a similar specialty.
(f) The CAPA-NS is not intended to be a substitute for the exercise of
professional judgment by the advanced practice registered nurse or by the
collaborating physician.
(g) The CAPA-NS shall be reviewed and signed by both the advanced practice
Page 11 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
registered nurse and the collaborating physician and may be rescinded by
either party upon written notice to the other party and the Kentucky Board of
Nursing.
(13) (a) Before an advanced practice registered nurse may discontinue or be exempt
from a CAPA-NS required under subsection (12) of this section, the advanced
practice registered nurse shall have completed four (4) years of prescribing as
a certified nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse midwife,
or as a certified registered nurse anesthetist. For nurse practitioners and
clinical nurse specialists, the four (4) years of prescribing shall be in a
population focus as defined in KRS 314.011.
(b) After four (4) years of prescribing with a CAPA-NS in collaboration with a
physician:
1. An advanced practice registered nurse whose license is in good standing
at that time with the Kentucky Board of Nursing and who will be
prescribing nonscheduled legend drugs without a CAPA-NS shall notify
that board that the four (4) year requirement has been met and that he or
she will be prescribing nonscheduled legend drugs without a CAPA-NS;
2. The advanced practice registered nurse will no longer be required to
maintain a CAPA-NS and shall not be compelled to maintain a CAPA-
NS as a condition to prescribe after the four (4) years have expired, but
an advanced practice registered nurse may choose to maintain a CAPA-
NS indefinitely after the four (4) years have expired; and
3. If the advanced practice registered nurse's license is not in good
standing, the CAPA-NS requirement shall not be removed until the
license is restored to good standing.
(c) An advanced practice registered nurse wishing to practice in Kentucky
through licensure by endorsement is exempt from the CAPA-NS requirement
Page 12 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
if the advanced practice registered nurse:
1. Has met the prescribing requirements in a state that grants independent
prescribing to advanced practice registered nurses; and
2. Has been prescribing for at least four (4) years.
(d) An advanced practice registered nurse wishing to practice in Kentucky
through licensure by endorsement who had a collaborative prescribing
agreement with a physician with an active and unrestricted license in another
state for at least four (4) years shall be[is] exempt from the CAPA-NS
requirement.
(14) (a) There is hereby established the "Collaborative Agreement for the Advanced
Practice Registered Nurse's Prescriptive Authority for Controlled Substances"
(CAPA-CS) Committee. The committee shall be composed of four (4)
members selected as follows:
1. Two (2) members shall be advanced practice registered nurses who
currently prescribe or have prescribed scheduled drugs, each appointed
by the Kentucky Board of Nursing from a list of names submitted for
each position by the Kentucky Association of Nurse Practitioners and
Nurse-Midwives; and
2. Two (2) members shall be physicians who have currently or had
previously a signed CAPA-CS with an advanced practice registered
nurse who prescribes scheduled drugs, each appointed by the Kentucky
Board of Medical Licensure from a list of names submitted for each
position by the Kentucky Medical Association.
(b) Within sixty (60) days of June 29, 2023, the committee shall develop a
standardized CAPA-CS form to be used in accordance with the provisions of
subsection (15) of this section. The standardized CAPA-CS form shall be used
by all advanced practice registered nurses and all physicians in Kentucky who
Page 13 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
enter into a CAPA-CS.
(c) The committee may be reconvened at the request of the Kentucky Board of
Nursing or the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure if it becomes necessary
to update the standardized CAPA-CS form.
(d) The Kentucky Board of Nursing and the Kentucky Board of Medical
Licensure shall each be responsible for and have exclusive authority over their
respective members appointed to the committee.
(e) The committee shall be attached to the Kentucky Board of Nursing for
administrative purposes. The Kentucky Board of Nursing shall be responsible
for the expenses of its members. The Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure
shall be responsible for the expenses of its members.
(f) The Kentucky Board of Nursing shall promulgate an administrative regulation
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A within ninety (90) days of June 29, 2023, to
establish and implement the standardized CAPA-CS form developed by the
committee.
(15) (a) Except as provided in subsections (17) and (18) of this section, before an
advanced practice registered nurse engages in the prescribing of Schedules II
through V controlled substances as authorized by KRS 314.011(8), the
advanced practice registered nurse shall enter into a written "Collaborative
Agreement for the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse's Prescriptive
Authority for Controlled Substances" (CAPA-CS) on a standardized CAPA-
CS form with a physician who has an active and unrestricted
license[licensed] in Kentucky that defines the scope of the prescriptive
authority for controlled substances.
(b) The advanced practice registered nurse shall notify the Kentucky Board of
Nursing of the existence of the CAPA-CS and the name of the collaborating
physician and shall, upon request, furnish to the board or its staff a copy of the
Page 14 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
completed standardized CAPA-CS form. The Kentucky Board of Nursing
shall notify the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure that a CAPA-CS exists
and furnish an executed copy of the Kentucky Board of Nursing notification
of a CAPA-CS completed by the advanced practice registered nurse to the
Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure.
(c) The CAPA-CS shall be in writing and signed by both the advanced practice
registered nurse and the collaborating physician. A copy of the completed
standardized CAPA-CS form shall be available at each site where the
advanced practice registered nurse is providing patient care.
(d) The CAPA-CS shall describe the arrangement for collaboration and
communication between the advanced practice registered nurse and the
collaborating physician regarding the prescribing of controlled substances by
the advanced practice registered nurse.
(e) The advanced practice registered nurse who is prescribing controlled
substances and the collaborating physician shall be qualified in the same or a
similar specialty.
(f) The CAPA-CS is not intended to be a substitute for the appropriate exercise
of professional judgment by the advanced practice registered nurse or by the
collaborating physician.
(g) The relevant statutes and regulations pertaining to the prescribing authority of
advanced practice registered nurses for controlled substances shall be
reviewed by the advanced practice registered nurse and the collaborating
physician at the outset of the CAPA-CS.
(h) Prior to prescribing controlled substances, the advanced practice registered
nurse shall obtain a Controlled Substance Registration Certificate through the
United States Drug Enforcement Administration.
(i) The CAPA-CS shall be reviewed and signed by both the advanced practice
Page 15 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
registered nurse and the collaborating physician and may be rescinded by
either party upon thirty (30) days written notice to the other party. The
advanced practice registered nurse shall notify the Kentucky Board of Nursing
that the CAPA-CS has been rescinded. The Kentucky Board of Nursing shall
notify the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure that the CAPA-CS has been
rescinded and shall furnish an executed copy of the Kentucky Board of
Nursing rescission of a CAPA-CS completed by the advanced practice
registered nurse or by the collaborating physician to the Kentucky Board of
Medical Licensure.
(j) The CAPA-CS shall state any limits on controlled substances which may be
prescribed by the advanced practice registered nurse, as agreed to by the
advanced practice registered nurse and the collaborating physician. The limits
so imposed may be more stringent than either the schedule limits on
controlled substances established in KRS 314.011(8) or the limits imposed in
regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Nursing thereunder. The
CAPA-CS shall also include any requirements, as agreed to by both the
advanced practice registered nurse and the collaborating physician, for
communication between the advanced practice registered nurse and the
collaborating physician.
(k) Within thirty (30) days of obtaining a Controlled Substance Registration
Certificate from the United States Drug Enforcement Administration, and
prior to prescribing controlled substances, the advanced practice registered
nurse shall register with the electronic system for monitoring controlled
substances established by KRS 218A.202 and shall provide a copy of the
registration certificate to the board.
(l) After June 29, 2023, for advanced practice registered nurses who have not had
a CAPA-CS:
Page 16 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
1. An advanced practice registered nurse wishing to have a CAPA-CS in
his or her first year of licensure must be employed by a health care
entity or provider. If the employing provider is an advanced practice
registered nurse, he or she must have completed four (4) years of
prescribing with a CAPA-CS and no longer be required to maintain a
CAPA-CS;
2. In the first year of the CAPA-CS, the advanced practice registered nurse
and the physician shall meet at least quarterly, either in person or via
video conferencing, to review the advanced practice registered nurse's
reverse KASPER report or that of the prescription drug monitoring
program (PDMP) currently in use in Kentucky pursuant to KRS
218A.202. The advanced practice registered nurse and the collaborating
physician may meet via telephonic communication when an in-person
meeting or videoconferencing session is not logistically or
technologically feasible. The review of specific prescriptions identified
in the reverse KASPER report or that of the PDMP currently in use in
Kentucky pursuant to KRS 218A.202 by the advanced practice
registered nurse and the collaborating physician may include
information from the patient's medical record that relates to the
condition or conditions being treated with controlled substances by the
advanced practice registered nurse to facilitate meaningful discussion. A
record of the meeting date, summary of discussions, and any
recommendations made shall be made in writing and a copy retained by
both parties to the agreement for a period of one (1) year past the
expiration of the CAPA-CS. The meeting records shall be subject to
audit by the Kentucky Board of Nursing for the advanced practice
registered nurse and by the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure for
Page 17 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
the physician. The sole purpose of the audit shall be to document that
the collaboration meetings have taken place as required by this section
and that other provisions of this section have been met; and
3. In the ensuing three (3) years of the CAPA-CS, the advanced practice
registered nurse and the physician shall meet at least biannually in
person or via video conferencing to review the advanced practice
registered nurse's reverse KASPER report or that of the PDMP currently
in use in Kentucky pursuant to KRS 218A.202. The advanced practice
registered nurse and the collaborating physician may meet via
telephonic communication when an in-person meeting or
videoconferencing session is not logistically or technologically feasible.
The review of specific prescriptions identified in the reverse KASPER
report or that of the PDMP currently in use in Kentucky pursuant to
KRS 218A.202 by the advanced practice registered nurse and the
collaborating physician may include information from the patient's
medical record that relates to the condition or conditions being treated
with controlled substances by the advanced practice registered nurse to
facilitate meaningful discussion. A record of the meeting date, summary
of discussions, and any recommendations made shall be noted in writing
and a copy retained by both parties to the agreement for a period of one
(1) year past the expiration of the CAPA-CS. The meeting records shall
be subject to audit by the Kentucky Board of Nursing for the advanced
practice registered nurse and by the Kentucky Board of Medical
Licensure for the physician. The sole purpose of the audit shall be to
document that the collaboration meetings have taken place as required
by this section and that other provisions of this section have been met.
(16) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring an advanced practice
Page 18 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
registered nurse designated by the board as a certified registered nurse anesthetist to
enter into a collaborative agreement with a physician, pursuant to this chapter or
any other provision of law, in order to deliver anesthesia care.
(17) (a) Except as provided in subsection (18) of this section, an advanced practice
registered nurse who wishes to continue to prescribe controlled substances
may be exempt from a CAPA-CS required under subsection (15) of this
section if the advanced practice registered nurse has:
1. Completed four (4) years of prescribing authority for controlled
substances with a CAPA-CS;
2. Maintained a United States Drug Enforcement Administration
registration; and
3. Maintained a master account with KASPER or the PDMP currently in
use in Kentucky pursuant to KRS 218A.202.
(b) On or after June 29, 2023:
1. An advanced practice registered nurse who has had four (4) years of
prescribing authority with a CAPA-CS and who wishes to prescribe
controlled substances without a CAPA-CS shall submit, via the APRN
update portal, a request for review from the Kentucky Board of Nursing
that the advanced practice registered nurse's license is in good standing;
2. An advanced practice registered nurse who has fewer than four (4) years
of prescribing authority with a CAPA-CS and who wishes to prescribe
controlled substances without a CAPA-CS shall complete the required
number of years under the then-current CAPA-CS to reach four (4)
years and shall submit, via the APRN update portal, a request for review
from the Kentucky Board of Nursing that the advanced practice
registered nurse's license is in good standing. However, if the then-
current CAPA-CS expires or is rescinded prior to the end of the four (4)
Page 19 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
year term, a new CAPA-CS shall be required and subject to the
provisions of this section;
3. The advanced practice registered nurse shall not prescribe controlled
substances without a CAPA-CS until the board has completed its review
and has notified the advanced practice registered nurse in writing that
the advanced practice registered nurse is exempt from the CAPA-CS
requirement; and
4. The review request shall include the payment of a fee set by the board
through the promulgation of an administrative regulation.
(c) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to this subsection, the Kentucky Board of
Nursing shall perform a review to determine whether the license of the
advanced practice registered nurse is in good standing based upon an
evaluation of the criteria specified in this subsection and in the administrative
regulation promulgated by the board pursuant to this subsection, including but
not limited to verification:
1. That a current United States Drug Enforcement Administration
registration certificate for the advanced practice registered nurse is on
file with the board;
2. That a current CAPA-CS notification for the advanced practice
registered nurse is on file with the board;
3. That the advanced practice registered nurse has an active master account
with the electronic system for monitoring controlled substances pursuant
to KRS 218A.202;
4. Through a criminal background check of the absence of any unreported
misdemeanor or felony convictions in Kentucky; and
5. Through a check of the coordinated licensure information system
specified in KRS 314.475 of the absence of any unreported disciplinary
Page 20 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
actions in another state.
(d) Based on the findings of these actions, the Kentucky Board of Nursing shall
determine if the advanced practice registered nurse's license is in good
standing for the purpose of removing the requirement for the advanced
practice registered nurse to have a CAPA-CS in order to prescribe controlled
substances.
(e) If the advanced practice registered nurse's license is found to be in good
standing, the advanced practice registered nurse shall be notified by the board
in writing that a CAPA-CS is no longer required. The advanced practice
registered nurse shall not be required to maintain a CAPA-CS as a condition
to prescribe controlled substances unless the board later imposes such a
requirement as part of an action instituted under KRS 314.091(1). An
advanced practice registered nurse may choose to maintain a CAPA-CS
indefinitely after the determination of good standing has been made. An
advanced practice registered nurse who chooses to prescribe without a CAPA-
CS shall be held to the same standard of care as all other providers with
prescriptive authority.
(f) If the advanced practice registered nurse's license is found not to be in good
standing, the CAPA-CS requirement shall not be removed until the license is
restored to good standing, as directed by the board.
(g) The Kentucky Board of Nursing shall conduct random audits of the
prescribing practices of advanced practice registered nurses, including those
who are no longer required to have a CAPA-CS in order to prescribe, through
a review of data obtained from the KASPER report or that of the PDMP
currently in use in Kentucky pursuant to KRS 218A.202 and shall take
disciplinary action under KRS 314.091(1) if a violation has occurred.
(18) (a) An advanced practice registered nurse wishing to practice in Kentucky
Page 21 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
through licensure by endorsement is exempt from the CAPA-CS requirement
if the advanced practice registered nurse:
1. Has met the prescribing requirements for controlled substances in a state
that grants such prescribing authority to advanced practice registered
nurses;
2. Has had authority to prescribe controlled substances for at least four (4)
years; and
3. Has a license in good standing as described in subsection (17) of this
section and in the administrative regulation promulgated by the board
pursuant to subsection (17) of this section.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse wishing to practice in Kentucky
through licensure by endorsement who has had the authority to prescribe
controlled substances for less than four (4) years and wishes to continue to
prescribe controlled substances shall enter into a CAPA-CS with a physician
who has an active and unrestricted license[licensed] in Kentucky and
comply with the provisions of this section until the cumulative four (4) year
requirement is met, after which the advanced practice registered nurse who
wishes to prescribe controlled substances without a CAPA-CS shall follow the
process identified in subsection (17) of this section and in the administrative
regulation promulgated by the board pursuant to subsection (17) of this
section.
(19) An advanced practice registered nurse shall not prescribe controlled substances
without a CAPA-CS until the board has completed its review and has notified the
advanced practice registered nurse in writing that the advanced practice registered
nurse is exempt from the CAPA-CS requirement.
Section 4. KRS 314.109 is amended to read as follows:
Any person under the jurisdiction of the board shall, within thirty (30)[ninety (90)] days
Page 22 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
of entry of an order or judgment, notify the board in writing of any misdemeanor or
felony criminal conviction, except traffic-related misdemeanors other than operating a
motor vehicle under the influence of drugs or alcohol, in this or any other jurisdiction.
The person shall submit a certified or attested copy of the order and a letter of
explanation.
Section 5. KRS 209.032 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Employee" means a person who:
1. Is hired directly or through a contract by a vulnerable adult services
provider who has duties that involve or may involve one-on-one contact
with a patient, resident, or client; or
2. Is a volunteer who has duties that are equivalent to the duties of an
employee providing direct services and the duties involve, or may
involve, one-on-one contact with a patient, resident, or client;
(b) "Validated substantiated finding of adult abuse, neglect, or exploitation"
means that the cabinet has:
1. Entered a final order concluding by a preponderance of the evidence that
an individual has committed adult abuse, neglect, or exploitation against
a different adult for whom the individual was providing care or services
as an employee or otherwise with the expectation of compensation;
2. The individual has been afforded an opportunity for an administrative
hearing under procedures compliant with KRS Chapter 13B, and an
appeal to the Circuit Court of the county where the abuse, neglect, or
exploitation is alleged to have occurred or, if the individual consents, to
the Franklin Circuit Court; and
3. That any appeal, including the time allowed for filing an appeal, has
concluded or expired; and
Page 23 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
(c) "Vulnerable adult service provider" means:
1. Adult day health care program centers as defined in KRS 216B.0441;
2. Adult day training facilities;
3. Assisted-living communities as defined in KRS 194A.700;
4. Boarding homes as defined in KRS 216B.300;
5. Group homes for individuals with an intellectual disability and
developmentally disabled (ID/DD);
6. Home health agencies as defined in KRS 216.935;
7. Hospice programs or residential hospice facilities licensed under KRS
Chapter 216B;
8. Long-term-care hospitals as defined in 42 U.S.C. sec.
1395ww(d)(1)(B)(iv);
9. Long-term-care facilities as defined in KRS 216.510;
10. Personal services agencies as defined in KRS 216.710;
11. Providers of home and community-based services authorized under KRS
Chapter 205, including home and community based waiver services and
supports for community living services; and
12. State-owned and operated psychiatric hospitals.
(2) A vulnerable adult services provider shall query the cabinet as to whether a
validated substantiated finding of adult abuse, neglect, or exploitation has been
entered against an individual who is a bona fide prospective employee of the
provider. The provider may periodically submit similar queries as to its current
employees and volunteers. The cabinet shall, except as provided under subsection
(5) of this section and any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder, reply
to either type of query only that it has or has not entered such a finding against the
named individual.
(3) An individual may query the cabinet as to whether the cabinet's records indicate
Page 24 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
that a validated substantiated finding of adult abuse, neglect, or exploitation has
been entered against him or her. The cabinet shall reply only that it has or has not
entered such a finding against the named individual, although this limitation shall
not be construed to prevent the individual who is the subject of the investigation
from obtaining cabinet records under other law, including the Kentucky Open
Records Act. An individual making a query under this subsection may direct that
the results of the query be provided to an alternative recipient seeking to utilize the
care or services of the querying individual.
(4) Every cabinet investigation of adult abuse, neglect, or exploitation committed by an
employee or a person otherwise acting with the expectation of compensation shall
be conducted in a manner affording the individual being investigated the level of
due process required to qualify any substantiated finding as a validated
substantiated finding of adult abuse, neglect, or exploitation.
(5) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section. Included in these
administrative regulations shall be:
(a) An error resolution process allowing an individual whose name is erroneously
reported to have been the subject of a validated substantiated finding of adult
abuse, neglect, or exploitation to request the correction of the cabinet's
records;
(b) A designation of the process by which queries may be submitted in
accordance with this section, which shall require that the queries be made
using a secure methodology and only by providers and persons authorized to
submit a query under this section; and
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary including but not limited
to subsection (2) of this section, a process of notification by which the cabinet
shall notify a vulnerable adult service provider who queries the cabinet
Page 25 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
pursuant to this section that the queried individual has appealed a
substantiated finding of adult abuse, neglect, or exploitation and that the
appeal is pending.
(6) If the cabinet does not respond to a query under subsection (2) of this section within
twenty-four (24) hours and a vulnerable adult services provider hires or utilizes an
employee provisionally, the provider shall not be subject to liability solely on the
basis of hiring or utilizing the employee before having received the cabinet's
response.
(7) This section shall only apply to instances of abuse, neglect, or exploitation
substantiated on or after July 15, 2014, which shall be compiled into a central
registry for the purpose of queries submitted under this section.
(8) A state licensing board may query the cabinet for any validated substantiated
finding of adult abuse, neglect, or exploitation existing for an individual who is
under the state licensing board's jurisdiction. The cabinet shall provide
information to the licensing board in accordance with KRS 61.878(5).
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 158.830 TO 158.838 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Administer" means to apply glucagon;
(b) "Authorized entity" means a public, private, or parochial school that has a
trained individual on the premises or is officially associated with the entity
who is trained as required under subsection (4) of this section to receive a
prescription for and administer undesignated glucagon;
(c) "Diabetes medical management plan" means a written, individualized
health care plan designed to acknowledge and prepare for the health care
needs of a student diagnosed with diabetes that is prepared by the student's
treating practitioner or practitioner team;
Page 26 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
(d) "Pharmacist" has the same meaning as in KRS 315.010;
(e) "Trained individual" means an individual who has successfully completed
an approved education training program under KRS 158.838; and
(f) "Undesignated glucagon" means glucagon prescribed in the name of an
authorized entity or trained individual.
(2) A health care practitioner, acting within the health care practitioner's scope of
practice, may prescribe undesignated glucagon in the name of an authorized
entity or trained individual for use in accordance with this section.
(3) A pharmacist may dispense undesignated glucagon for a prescription issued in
the name of an authorized entity or trained individual for use in accordance with
this section.
(4) A trained individual who has successfully completed the training requirements
under KRS 158.838 may:
(a) Receive a prescription for undesignated glucagon from a health care
practitioner or pharmacist; and
(b) Administer undesignated glucagon in an emergency situation when a
school nurse or other licensed health care practitioner is not immediately
available and the trained individual believes in good faith that a student is
experiencing severe hypoglycemia or other conditions noted in that
student's diabetes medical management plan, regardless of whether that
student has a prescription for glucagon.
(5) An authorized entity that acquires and stocks a supply of undesignated glucagon
with a valid prescription shall:
(a) Store the undesignated glucagon in accordance with the manufacturer's
instructions and any additional requirements established by the Kentucky
Department for Public Health; and
(b) Designate a trained individual to be responsible for the storage,
Page 27 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
maintenance, and general oversight of the undesignated glucagon acquired
by the authorized entity.
(6) Any authorized entity or trained individual that acquires and stocks a supply of
undesignated glucagon in accordance with this section shall notify an agent of
the local emergency medical services and the local emergency communications or
dispatch center of the existence, location, and type of glucagon acquired.
(7) Any authorized entity or trained individual that administers or provides
undesignated glucagon to a student who is believed to be experiencing severe
hypoglycemia or other conditions noted in that student's diabetes medical
management plan shall contact the student's parent, guardian, or emergency
contact, and local emergency medical services as soon as possible.
(8) The requirements of subsection (7) of this section shall not apply to any
individual who administers or provides undesignated glucagon if that individual
is acting as a Good Samaritan under KRS 313.035 and 411.148.
(9) Any authorized entity or trained individual that, in good faith and without
compensation, renders emergency care or treatment by the use of undesignated
glucagon under Sections 6, 7, and 8 of this Act shall be immune from civil
liability for any personal injury resulting from the care or treatment, or resulting
from any act or failure to act in providing or arranging further medical
treatment, if the person accts as an ordinary, reasonably prudent person would
have acted under the same or similar circumstances.
(10) The immunity under subsection (9) of this section applies to:
(a) A health care practitioner who prescribes or authorizes the emergency use
of undesignated glucagon;
(b) A pharmacist who fills a prescription for undesignated glucagon;
(c) A trained individual who administers or provides undesignated glucagon;
(d) An authorized entity that acquires and stocks undesignated glucagon, or
Page 28 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
provides undesignated glucagon to a trained individual; and
(e) An individual trainer or training entity providing the required training to a
trained individual.
(11) The immunity under subsection (9) of this section shall not apply if the personal
injury results from the gross negligence or willful or wonton misconduct of the
person rendering the care or treatment.
Section 7. KRS 158.832 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 158.830 to 158.838:
(1) "Anaphylaxis" means an allergic reaction resulting from sensitization following
prior contact with an antigen which can be a life-threatening emergency.
Anaphylaxis may be triggered by, among other agents, foods, drugs, injections,
insect stings, and physical activity;
(2) "Bronchodilator rescue inhaler" means medication used to relieve asthma
symptoms or respiratory distress along with devices and device components needed
to appropriately administer the medication, including but not limited to disposable
spacers;
(3) "Medications" means all medicines individually prescribed by a health care
practitioner for the student that pertain to his or her documented medical condition
including a life-threatening allergy, asthma, [or are used to treat ]risk of
anaphylaxis, risk of respiratory distress, diabetes, hypoglycemia, adrenal crisis, or
other documented medical condition, including [but not limited to injectable
]epinephrine, [devices or ]bronchodilator rescue inhalers, nebulizers, glucagon,
Solu-Cortef, or other medication;
(4) "Health care practitioner" means a physician or other health care provider who has
prescriptive authority;
(5) "Self-administration" means the student's use of his or her prescribed [asthma or
anaphylaxis ]medications, pursuant to prescription or written direction from the
Page 29 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
health care practitioner; and
(6) "Seizure action plan" means a written, individualized health plan designed to
acknowledge and prepare for the health care needs of a student diagnosed with a
seizure disorder that is prepared by the student's treating physician.
Section 8. KRS 158.834 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board of each local public school district and the governing body of each
private and parochial school or school district shall permit the self-administration of
medications by a student who has a documented medical condition including a
life-threatening allergy, asthma, risk of anaphylaxis, risk of respiratory distress,
diabetes, hypoglycemia, adrenal crisis, or other medical condition[with asthma or
by a student who is at risk of having anaphylaxis] if the student's parent or
guardian:
(a) Provides written authorization for self-administration to the school; and
(b) Provides a written statement from the student's health care practitioner that the
student has a documented medical condition[asthma or is at risk of having
anaphylaxis] and has been instructed in self-administration of the student's
prescribed medications to treat the documented medical condition[asthma or
anaphylaxis]. The statement shall also contain the following information:
1. The name and purpose of the medications;
2. The prescribed dosage;
3. The time or times the medications are to be regularly administered and
under what additional special circumstances the medications are to be
administered; and
4. The length of time for which the medications are prescribed.
(2) The statements required in subsection (1) of this section shall be kept on file in the
office of the school nurse or school administrator.
(3) The school district or the governing body of each private and parochial school or
Page 30 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
school district shall inform the parent or guardian of the student that the school and
its employees and agents shall incur no liability as a result of any injury sustained
by the student from the self-administration of his or her medications to treat his or
her documented medical condition[asthma or anaphylaxis]. The parent or guardian
of the student shall sign a statement acknowledging that the school shall incur no
liability and the parent or guardian shall indemnify and hold harmless the school
and its employees against any claims relating to the self-administration of
medications used to treat his or her documented medical condition[asthma or
anaphylaxis]. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to relieve liability of the
school or its employees for negligence.
(4) The permission for self-administration of medications shall be effective for the
school year in which it is granted and shall be renewed each following school year
upon fulfilling the requirements of subsections (1) to (3) of this section.
Section 9. KRS 158.836 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon fulfilling the requirements of KRS 158.834, a student with a documented
medical condition including a life-threatening allergy, asthma, risk of
anaphylaxis, risk of respiratory distress, diabetes, hypoglycemia, adrenal crisis, or
other documented medical condition[asthma or a student who is at risk of having
anaphylaxis] may possess and use medications to treat the documented medical
condition[asthma or anaphylaxis] when at school, at a school-sponsored activity,
under the supervision of school personnel, or before and after normal school
activities while on school properties including school-sponsored child care or after-
school programs.
(2) A student who has a documented medical condition[life-threatening allergy] shall
have:
(a) [An injectable ]Epinephrine[ device], a bronchodilator rescue inhaler,
nebulizer, glucagon, Solu-Cortef, or other medication as prescribed by a
Page 31 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
health care practitioner and provided by his or her parent or guardian in his
or her possession or in the possession of the school nurse, school
administrator, or his or her designee in all school environments that the
student may be in, including the classroom, the cafeteria, the school bus, and
on field trips; and
(b) A written individual health care plan in place for the prevention and proactive
management for the student in all school environments that the student may
be in, including the classroom, the cafeteria, the school bus, and on field trips.
The individual health care plan required under this paragraph may be
incorporated in the student's individualized education program required under
Pub. L. No. 94-142 or the student's 504 plan required under Pub. L. No. 93-
112.
(3) (a) Each school is encouraged to keep [an injectable ]epinephrine[ device] in a
minimum of two (2) locations in the school, including but not limited to the
school office and the school cafeteria, so that epinephrine may be
administered to any student believed to be having a life-threatening allergic or
anaphylactic reaction. Schools electing to keep [injectable ]epinephrine
[devices ]shall maintain it[them] in a secure, accessible, but unlocked
location. The provisions of this paragraph shall apply to the extent that the
[injectable ]epinephrine is[devices are] donated to a school or a school has
sufficient funding to purchase the [injectable ]epinephrine[ devices].
(b) Each school is encouraged to keep a bronchodilator rescue inhaler or
nebulizer in a minimum of two (2) locations in the school, including but not
limited to the school office and athletic office, so that bronchodilator rescue
inhalers or nebulizers may be administered to any student believed to be
having asthma symptoms or respiratory distress. Schools electing to keep
bronchodilator rescue inhalers or nebulizers shall maintain them in a secure,
Page 32 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
accessible, but unlocked location. The provisions of this paragraph shall apply
to the extent that the bronchodilator rescue inhalers or nebulizers are donated
to a school or a school has sufficient funding to purchase the bronchodilator
rescue inhalers or nebulizers.
(c) Each school is encouraged to stock undesignated glucagon as permitted
under Section 6 of this Act, in a minimum of two (2) locations in the school,
including but not limited to the school office and athletic office, so that
undesignated glucagon may be administered to any student believed to be
having low blood sugar symptoms or hypoglycemia. Schools electing to
stock undesignated glucagon shall maintain it in a secure, accessible, but
unlocked location and in accordance with Section 6 of this Act. The
provisions of this paragraph shall apply to the extent that the undesignated
glucagon is donated to a school or a school has sufficient funding to
purchase and stock undesignated glucagon.
(d) Each school electing to keep [injectable ]epinephrine[ devices] or
bronchodilator rescue inhalers, nebulizers, or undesignated glucagon, shall
implement policies and procedures for managing a student's life-threatening
allergic reaction, anaphylactic reaction, [or ]asthma[ ], or hypoglycemia,
developed and approved by the local school board.
(e)[(d)] The Kentucky Department for Public Health shall develop clinical
protocols in the school health section of the Core Clinical Service Guide
manual that is maintained in the county or district public health department to
address [injectable ]epinephrine[ devices], [and ]bronchodilator rescue
inhalers[ ], nebulizers, and glucagon kept by schools under this subsection
and to advise on clinical administration of the [injectable ]epinephrine[
devices], [and ]bronchodilator rescue inhalers, nebulizers, and glucagon. The
protocols shall be developed in collaboration with local health departments or
Page 33 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1130
local clinical providers and local schools and local school districts.
(4) Any school employee authorized under KRS 156.502 to administer medication
shall not be liable for any civil damages for ordinary negligence in acts or
omissions resulting from the administration or the assistance in the administration
of epinephrine, [or ]a bronchodilator rescue inhaler, nebulizer, glucagon, Solu-
Cortef, or other prescribed medication to any student believed in good faith to be
having a life-threatening allergic or anaphylactic reaction, [or ]asthma symptoms or
respiratory distress, hypoglycemia, or adrenal crisis.
Page 34 of 34
BR113000.100 - 1130 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:45 PM Jacketed